Hawaii, session 2025, GM1404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 515-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§515-6 Restrictive covenants and conditions. (a) Every
provision in an oral agreement or a written instrument relating
to real property that purports to forbid or restrict the
conveyance, encumbrance, occupancy, or lease thereof to
individuals because of race, sex, including gender identity or
expression, sexual orientation, color, religion, marital status,
familial status, ancestry, disability, age, or human
immunodeficiency virus infection, [is] shall be void.
(b) Every condition, restriction, or prohibition,
including a right of entry or possibility of reverter, that
directly or indirectly limits the use or occupancy of real
property on the basis of race, sex, including gender identity or
expression, sexual orientation, color, religion, marital status,
familial status, ancestry, disability, age, or human
immunodeficiency virus infection [is] shall be void, except a
2025-2753 SB31 GDI SMA.docx 1
■HiimiiMMiim

Page 2 S.B. NO. s-
C.D. 1
limitation, on the basis of religion, on the use of real
property held by a religious institution or organization or by a
religious or charitable organization operated, supervised, or
controlled by a religious institution or organization, and used
for religious or charitable purposes.
(c) It [is] shall be a discriminatory practice to insert
in a written instrument relating to real property a provision
that is void under this section or to honor or attempt to honor
[•sseh—a] the provision in the chain of title.
(d) Any person who discovers a recorded discriminatory
restrictive covenant may:
(1) With the consent of all parties to a real estate
transaction, include in any deed, mortgage, or other
instrument filed for recording in connection with the
transaction a statement that the discriminatory
restrictive covenant is void and unenforceable; or
(2) Prepare and record a separate notice, cross-referenced
to the discriminatory restrictive covenant, stating
that the discriminatory restrictive covenant is void
and unenforceable.
2025-2753 SB31 CDl SMA.docx 2

Page 3 S.B. NO 31
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(e) The statement or notice described under subsection (d)
shall be in a form substantially similar with the following:
"The chain of title for the real property described
herein contains a restrictive covenant that, if
enforced, would discriminate against individuals based
u£on their ra£e^sex^Jm£]jjdjjT^2ender 2^derrtdt y or
expression, sexual orientation, color, religion,
marital status, familial status, ancestry, disability,
age, human immunodeficiency virus infection, or
national origin. The covenant is void, unenforceable,
and antithetical to American values of justice and
equal protection under the law."
(f) A person who in good faith:
(1) Prepares or causes to be prepared; or
(2) Records or causes to be recorded,
a statement or notice under subsection (d) shall be immune from
liability for incorrectly stating that the restrictive covenant
is discriminatory.
(g) For the purposes of this section, "discriminatory
restrictive covenant" means any restrictive covenant on real
property that, if enforced, would violate the:
2025-2753 SB31 CDl SMA.docx 3

Page 4 SB. NO 31
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(1) Equal protection clause of the United States
Constitution and article I, section 5, of the Hawaii
State Constitution;
(2) Prohibition in the federal Fair Housing Act (42 U.S.C.
3601 et seq.) against discrimination on the basis of
race, color, sex, religion, familial status,
disability, or national origin; or
(3) Prohibition against discrimination on the basis of
race, sex, including gender identity or expression,
sexual orientation, color, religion, marital status,
familial status, ancestry, disability, age, or human
immunodeficiency virus infection."
SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2753 SB31 CDl SMA.docx

S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this day of , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 31, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 31,SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives